Montana, session 2025, HB747.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 52-2-735, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-735. Health protection -- certification required. (1) The department shall adopt rules for the
protection of children in day-care centers from the health hazards of inadequate food preparation, poor
nutrition, and communicable diseases. Rules adopted by the department must include rules requiring children
under 5 years of age to be immunized against Haemophilus influenza type "b" before being admitted for care in
the facility unless an exemption has been claimed as provided in 20-5-405.
(2) A day-care center that provides care for children who are under 1 year of age or who are
considered at risk of becoming severely ill from communicable diseases because of individual health care
needs may adopt a policy regarding whether the day-care center accepts exemptions pursuant to 20-5-405(1).
The day-care center shall provide notice to parents or guardians of a policy adopted under this subsection (2).
(2)(3) Local public health authorities shall arrange to provide training to day-care center providers and
employees regarding health hazards. Upon successful completion of the training the local public health
authorities shall issue certificates to the providers and employees.
(3)(4) In lieu of training, local public health authorities may elect to inspect facilities and issue
certificates of approval to child-care center providers.
(4)(5) Each applicant for a license to operate a day-care center shall submit to the department a
certificate issued pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) or (4) before the department will issue a license.
(5)(6) The local public health authority may charge the applicant a reasonable fee, not to exceed $25,
for any inspection necessary to issue a certificate of approval, or a fee not to exceed the documented cost for
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 747

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 747.1
training it provides under this section."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 747